Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.160

Transcribing mutilated records—Auditor to direct transcribing, certify.

The books containing the transcribed records shall be certified by the county auditor, under whose direction the transcribing was done, as being true copies of the original.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.32.160. Prior: 1893 c 14 s 2; RRS s 4066.]